Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2306
Transcripts; costs; payment by county.

In any civil or criminal case in which a party is permitted to proceed in forma pauperis, the court shall order transcripts to be furnished without cost if the suit or appeal is not frivolous but presents a substantial question and if the transcript is needed to prepare, present, or decide the issue presented by the case or appeal. Such costs shall be paid by the county in the same manner as other claims are paid.

Laws 1972, LB 1120, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 689, § 9.